California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the authority of a city or city and county to restrict or limit the consumption of alcoholic beverages, as described in this subdivision, pursuant to Section 23791.

(d) A license or permit is not required for the serving of alcoholic beverages as part of the curriculum of an apprenticeship program for bartending or
 mixology, provided all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The apprenticeship program is approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code.

(2) Students enrolled in the apprenticeship program are 21 years of age or older.

(3) The apprenticeship program adopts a policy that the students may taste, but may not consume, the alcoholic beverages served.

(4) There is no extra charge or fee for the alcoholic beverages served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 17.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.52.

(a) The department may create and issue a special on-sale general license to a person who owns or operates a facility that is partially located in the County of Placer and partially located in the County of Washoe, State of Nevada, subject to the following:

(1) The licensed premises is located on a single contiguous property of not less than three acres, and not more than seven acres, in the County of Placer and of at least eight acres in the County of Washoe, State of Nevada, where the gross floor area of structures in the County of Placer is no greater than 20 percent of the total gross floor area of all structures located in both counties.

(2) The facility consists of at least a restaurant, casino, conference center, and hotel.

(3) The licensed premises is operated as an integral part of the facility.

(4) The license shall not be transferable except from person to person.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, and subject only to Section 25658, the sale, furnishing, or delivery of alcoholic beverages by the licensee within the facility shall be deemed to be a sale in the State of Nevada.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 23661, and any related provision of this division, persons may import alcoholic beverages into California from the State of Nevada only within the
 facility for personal use and not for resale.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 23402, and any related provision of this division, the licensee shall not be authorized to purchase alcoholic beverages from California licensees.

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 23405, 23405.1, 23405.2, and 25752, and any related provision of this division, the licensee shall not be required to maintain records on the licensed premises. However, records shall be maintained at the facility and the licensee shall provide any such records to the department promptly upon demand.

(f) (1) The licensee shall not be subject to any restrictions set forth in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 25500), in its entirety, at the
 facility.

(2) The licensee shall not be subject to any restrictions set forth in Sections 25600, 25600.1, 25600.2, 25600.3, 25600.5, 25611.1, 25611.2, 25611.3, 25612, 25612.5, and 25613, and any related
 provision of this division, except to the extent the prohibited conduct substantially occurs in California.

(g) The facility shall not be subject to Sections 25631, 25632, and 25633, and any related provision of this division.

(h) In all other respects, the licensee shall comply with and be subject to the provisions of this division.

(i) The fee for a special on-sale general license shall be the same as that specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 23320 for an original on-sale general license. The annual fee for the special on-sale general license shall be the same as that for an on-sale general license. The special on-sale general license authorized by this section shall not be
 included in the number of on-sale general licenses available pursuant to, or otherwise subject to the requirements of, Section 23816. All money collected as fees pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(j) The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances of the premises located in both the County of Placer and the State of Nevada.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   (AB 2971)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.6.

(a) Any licensee under a winegrower’s license may apply to the department for a wine sales event permit. The wine sales event permit shall authorize the sale of bottled wine produced by the winegrower at festivals, state, county, district, or citrus fruit fairs, civic or cultural celebrations, or similar events approved by the department. The sale of the wine shall not be the primary purpose of the event, and the sale shall be for consumption off the premises where sold. The permit shall be valid for the entire duration of the event. The event shall be sponsored by an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 23701a of the Revenue and Taxation Code, including state designated fairs as specified in Section 19418 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or exempt from taxation under Section 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f,
 23701g, 23701i, 23701k, 23701l, 23701r, or 23701w of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) A wine sales event permit may not be used more than two times a month at a particular location.

(c) Consent for sales at each event shall be first obtained by an annual authorization issued by the department. The applicant for the wine sales permit is required to notify the city, county, or city and county where the event is being held at least five days prior to the event. At all events, a copy of the wine sales permit shall be maintained. The licensee may exercise only those privileges authorized by the licensee’s license and shall comply with all provisions of the act pertaining to that license, and any violation of those provisions may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license or permit, or both, as though the violation occurred on the licensed premises.

(d) (1) A licensee may not sell more than 5,000 gallons of wine annually pursuant to wine sales event permits issued under this section to that licensee.

(2) A licensee holding a wine sales event permit may not sell more than 1,250 gallons of wine per event.

(3) A licensee that is eligible to receive a certified farmers’ market sales permit under Section 23399.4 and a wine sales event permit may not, under both permits collectively, sell more than a total of 5,000 gallons of wine annually.

(4) The licensee shall annually report to the department the total gallons of wine sold by that licensee under permits issued under this section to that licensee. The report may be included within the annual report of production submitted by the
 licensee to the department, or may be made in another manner as prescribed by the department in regulation.

(e) The sponsoring tax-exempt organization may charge a fee of the licensee for the licensee’s use of display booth space. The fee, if paid, shall be comparable with, or less than, fees, or goods or services of equivalent value, paid by other vendors at the event for a similar booth size and location.

(f) The sponsoring tax-exempt organization shall allow the participation of more than one winegrower under a wine sales event permit at an event if public attendance at the event is expected to reach or exceed 1,000 attendees. The prior year’s stated attendance for the event shall be used to determine the expected attendance.

(g) The authorization may be renewable annually at the time of the licensee’s license.
 The wine sales permit authorization shall be transferable as part of the license.

(h) The department may adopt any regulations as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 29.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.65.

(a) A licensed beer manufacturer may apply to the department for a brewery event permit. A brewery event permit shall authorize the sale of beer produced by the licensee pursuant to Section 23357 for consumption on property contiguous and adjacent to the licensed premises owned or under the control of the licensee. The property shall be secured and controlled by the licensee.

(b) (1) The annual fee for a brewery event permit for a licensed beer manufacturer shall be the same as the event permit fee specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320. The permit may be renewed annually at the same time as the licensee’s license. A brewery event permit shall be transferable as a part of the license.

(2) For each brewery event, consent for the sale of beer pursuant to subdivision (a) at the brewery event shall be first obtained by the licensee from the department in the form of an event authorization issued by the department. An event authorization shall be subject to approval by the appropriate local law enforcement agency. The fee for each event authorization shall be the same as the event authorization fee specified in Section 23399. The number of events authorized by a brewery event permit shall not exceed four in any calendar year.

(3) All moneys collected as fees pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund, as described in Section 25761, for allocation, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as provided in subdivision (d) of that section.

(c) At all approved events, the
 licensee may exercise only those privileges authorized by the licensee’s license and shall comply with all provisions of the act pertaining to the conduct of on-sale premises, and violation of those provisions may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license or permit, or both, as though the violation occurred on the licensed premises.

(d) The department may adopt any regulations it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 30.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.7.

Any license issued to any golf course facility, or any license issued to a licensee that operates at any golf course facility, entitles the licensee to make sales of alcoholic beverages from any golf cart, as defined in Section 345 of the Vehicle Code, that the licensee operates on the golf course premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective June 6, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23400.

An on-sale general license authorizes the purchase and possession of distilled spirits in packages which packages shall conform with standards of fill for distilled spirits in all respects to the regulations issued pursuant to Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. Secs. 201 et seq.) and any amendments thereto. An on-sale general license shall not authorize the purchase of distilled spirits in packages containing less than six ounces or whiskey, gin, or vodka in packages containing one-tenth gallon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

23401.

An on-sale general license, with respect to beer and wine, and any on-sale license, with respect to the particular beverage or beverages mentioned in the license, also authorizes the exercise of the rights and privileges granted by an off-sale beer and wine license; provided, however, that a daily on-sale general license issued pursuant to Section 24045.1 shall not authorize the foregoing rights and privileges. None of the licensees mentioned in this section may, by reason of any license mentioned in this section, label, bottle, package, or refill any package with any alcoholic beverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

23401.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the holder of an on-sale license for a bona fide public eating place that has off-sale privileges, or a licensed beer manufacturer, licensed wine manufacturer, or licensed craft distiller that operates a bona fide public eating place at its premises of production, may exercise the following rights and privileges subject to the requirements of this section:

(1) The licensee may sell the distilled spirits for off-sale consumption for which their license permits on-sale consumption provided the beverages are in manufacturer-prepackaged containers and ordered and picked up by the consumer in compliance with subdivision (b).

(2) In addition to the privilege provided by paragraph (1), the licensee may sell the alcoholic beverages, except beer, for off-sale consumption for which their license permits on-sale consumption when the beverages are not in manufacturer-prepackaged containers if the following conditions are met:

(A) The alcoholic beverages are packaged in a container with a secure lid or cap sealed in a manner designed to prevent consumption without removal of the lid or cap by breaking the seal.

(B) Wine is sold only in single-serve containers. For purposes of this subparagraph, “single-serve containers” means containers that have a standard of fill between 187 milliliters and 355 milliliters that is authorized for wine
 under Section 4.72 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) Mixed drinks and cocktails sold for off-sale consumption
 pursuant to the authorization granted by this section shall not exceed four and one-half ounces of distilled spirits.

(D) Alcoholic beverages sold pursuant to this paragraph shall be sold in conjunction with a bona fide meal, and shall be limited to two such drinks per bona fide meal. For purposes of this requirement, a “bona fide meal” shall conform to the guidance issued by the department on July 5, 2020, entitled “What is required to be considered a ‘meal’?,” available on the department’s internet website.

(E) The container is clearly and conspicuously labeled or otherwise identified as containing an alcoholic beverage.

(F) (i) The following warning sign is posted in a manner that notifies
 consumers of restrictions regarding open container laws:
“Alcoholic beverages that are packaged by this establishment are open containers and shall not be transported in a motor vehicle except in the vehicle’s trunk or, if there is no trunk, the containers shall be kept in some other area of the vehicle that is not normally occupied by the driver or passengers. This does not include a utility compartment or glove compartment (See Vehicle Code Section 23225). Additionally, these beverages shall not be consumed in public or in any other area where open containers are prohibited by law.”
(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “post” means to prominently display on the premises, post online, or present in whatever manner is
 necessary to ensure that the consumer purchasing the beverages to which this section applies is given notice of this warning.

(G) The alcoholic beverages are ordered and picked up by the consumer in compliance with subdivision (b).

(3) Nothing in this section shall require a licensee to sell alcoholic beverages for off-sale consumption whether or not the alcoholic beverage is in a manufacturer-sealed prepackaged container or otherwise.

(b) An alcoholic beverage sold pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet both of the following conditions:

(1) The alcoholic beverage shall be ordered by the consumer online, over the telephone, or in person, for pickup by
 the consumer.

(2) The consumer who places the order for an alcoholic beverage shall pick up the order directly from the licensee and shall present a bona fide identification card for purposes of confirming the age and identity of the consumer who placed the order. The alcoholic beverage shall not be ordered or picked up for delivery.

(c) Prior to exercising the privileges authorized in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the licensee shall notify the department in writing of its intent to do so.

(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department may at any time impose conditions on a license restricting or prohibiting the licensee from selling or furnishing any alcoholic beverage pursuant to this Section.

(1) Any conditions imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be based upon a showing of good cause. Good cause includes, but is not limited to, a written request, including the reason for the restriction or prohibition, from a local law enforcement agency or local governing body, or its designated subordinate officer or agency.

(2) A licensee may petition the department to modify or remove a condition within 10 days following imposition of the condition.

(A) A petition under this paragraph shall be subject to the same fee as provided in Section 23803.

(B) If the department denies the licensee’s petition, the licensee may request a hearing, which shall be
 conducted in the same manner as provided in Section 23805.

(C) In any hearing pursuant to this paragraph, the licensee shall have the burden to establish that the condition is unreasonable or that no good cause exists for its imposition. The condition shall remain in effect during any appeal of its imposition.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude privileges authorized pursuant to Sections 23401 and 23661.3.

(f) This section shall be operative until December 31, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 829, Sec. 1.   (AB 2663)   Effective September 30, 2026.   Repealed as of December 31, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23402.

No retail on- or off-sale licensee, except a daily on-sale general licensee holding a license issued pursuant to Section 24045.1, shall purchase alcoholic beverages for resale from any person except a person holding a beer manufacturer's, wine grower's, rectifier's, brandy manufacturer's, or wholesaler’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

23402.5.

(a) A retail licensee shall not sell or offer for sale any beer that is purchased from a beer manufacturer at the beer manufacturer’s licensed premises under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The beer manufacturer from which the beer is purchased has not filed a price schedule pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000) for the sale of that beer in the county in which the retail
 licensee’s premises at which the beer is being sold or offered for sale is located.

(2) The price at which the retailer purchases the beer is different from the price in the price schedule filed by the beer manufacturer pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000) from which the beer is purchased.

(3) The beer container contains the statement or is marked “Not Packaged for Resale”.

(b) Nothing in this section creates any exception to the requirements of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 519, Sec. 3.   (AB 776)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23403.

No retail licensee, except a pharmacy or drug store registered with the California State Board of Pharmacy, shall sell or possess on his licensed premises any undenatured alcohol of any proof or compound thereof which is an alcoholic beverage as defined in Section 23004 containing more than 60 percent of alcohol by volume. Undenatured alcohol shall be sold at retail only upon the prescription or order of the holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate or a dentist’s or veterinarian’s license. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23404.

It is unlawful for any salesman to aid or abet in the violation of any of the provisions of this division or knowingly to become a party, either directly or indirectly, in the violation of any of the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23405.

(a) Any corporation holding a license under this division shall maintain a record of its shareholders at the principal office of the corporation in California and the record of its shareholders shall be available to the department for inspection. The corporation shall report to the department in writing any of the following:

(1) Issuance or transfer of any shares of stock to any person where the issuance or transfer results in the person owning 10 percent or more of the corporate
 stock.

(2) Change in any of the corporate officers which are required by Section 312 of the Corporations Code.

(3) Change of the members of its board of directors.

The report shall be filed with the department within 30 days after the issuance or transfer of corporate stock, change in corporate officers, or change in members of the board of directors, as the case may be.

(b) Any licensee within the purview of this section who is required by federal law to report to the federal government under the provisions of the Federal Alcohol Administration Act or the Internal Revenue Code the information required by this section may send to the department a copy of the report at the same time as it is sent to the federal government, and the copy of the report sent to the department by
 the licensee shall be deemed sufficient compliance with the provisions of this section.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A corporation the stock of which is listed on a stock exchange in this state or in the City of New York, State of New York.

(2) A bank, trust company, financial institution or title company to which a license is issued in a fiduciary capacity.

(3) A corporation which is required by law to file periodic reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(d) The department may deny any application or suspend or revoke any license of a corporation subject to the provisions of this section where conditions exist in relation to
 any officer, director, or person holding 10 percent or more of the corporate stock of that corporation which would constitute grounds for disciplinary action against that person if the person was a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23405.1.

(a) Any limited partnership holding a license under this division shall maintain a register at the principal office of the limited partnership in California and the register shall be available to the department for inspection. The limited partnership shall report to the department in writing the assignment or transfer of the interest of any limited partner of the limited partnership where the assignment or transfer results in a person owning as a limited partner 10 percent or more of the capital or profits of the limited partnership. The
 limited partnership shall report to the department in writing any change in the general partners of the limited partnership.

The report shall be filed with the department within 30 days after the assignment or transfer of the limited partnership interest.

(b) Any licensee within the purview of this section who is required by federal law to report to the federal government under the provisions of the Federal Alcohol Administration Act or the Internal Revenue Code the information required by this section shall send to the department a copy of the report at the same time as it is sent to the federal government. The copy of the report sent to the department by the licensee shall be deemed sufficient compliance with the provisions of this section.

(c) The department may deny any application or suspend or revoke any license of a limited
 partnership subject to the provisions of this section where conditions exist in relation to any general partner or any limited partner holding 10 percent or more of the capital or profits of the limited partnership that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action against that person if he or she were a licensee.

(d) The register referred to in subdivision (a) of this section shall consist of a register showing the names of the current limited partners (whether original limited partners or substituted limited partners), the current assignees of limited partnership interests and their addresses, the interest in the capital and profits of the limited partnership owned by each limited partner and each assignee of a limited partnership interest, the number and date of certificates, if any, issued for limited partnership interests, and the number and date of cancellation of every certificate surrendered for cancellation. The above information
 may be kept by the limited partnership on punchcards, magnetic tape, or other information storage device related to electronic data-processing equipment provided that the card, tape, or other equipment is capable of reproducing the information in clearly legible form for the purposes of inspection as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23405.2.

(a) Any limited liability company holding a license under this division shall maintain a record of its members at the principal office of the company in California and the record of its members shall be available to the department for inspection. The company shall report to the department in writing any of the following:

(1) Issuance or
 transfer of memberships to any person where the issuance or transfer results in the person owning 10 percent or more of the voting interests of the company.

(2) If the limited liability company is managed by a manager or managers, any change in the manager or managers of the company.

(3) If any officer has been appointed, any change in the officers of the company.

The report shall be filed with the department within 30 days after the issuance or transfer of membership voting interests, or any change in members, managers, or officers.

(b) Any limited liability company within the purview of this section that is required under the provisions of the Federal Alcohol Administration Act or the Internal Revenue Code to report to the federal government the information required by
 this section may send to the department a copy of the report at the same time as it is sent to the federal government. The copy of the report sent to the department by the company shall be deemed sufficient compliance with the provisions of this section.

(c) The reporting requirements of subdivision (b) shall not apply to a limited liability company that is required by law to file periodic reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(d) The person or persons who are required to sign the application shall certify to the department on forms prescribed by the department whether or not any member, manager, or officer holds an ownership interest, directly or indirectly, in any license within or without this state to manufacture, import, distribute, rectify, or sell alcoholic beverages. The department may deny any application or suspend or revoke any license under this section
 in the event any member, manager, or officer holds or acquires any prohibited ownership interest, directly or indirectly, in any licensed business in violation of the tied-house provisions of Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 25500).

(e) The department may deny any application and suspend or revoke any license of a limited liability company subject to the provisions of this section where conditions exist in relation to any manager, officer, or person holding 10 percent or more of the voting interests of the limited liability company that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action against the person if he or she was a licensee.

(f) All articles of organization and operating agreements of a limited liability company or certificates or amendments thereto shall be filed with the department at the time of filing the application for the license. All articles of organization,
 operating agreements, certificates, or amendments executed after the issuance of the license shall be filed with the department within 30 days after execution.

(g) The requirements of this section are in addition to the requirements set forth in the California Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company Act (Title 2.6 (commencing with Section 17701.01) of the Corporations Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 3.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

23405.3.

If a corporation, limited partnership, or limited liability company holds, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the ownership of a license issued under this division, the licensee shall report any change in the ownership, management, or control of that corporation, limited partnership, or limited liability company, in the same manner as would be required by Sections 23405, 23405.1, and 23405.2, if the corporation, limited partnership, or limited liability company were itself the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 508, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

23405.4.

(a) The department is not required to qualify for a license a person who is an investor in a private equity fund that holds an interest in a license, provided all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The private equity fund’s interest in the license is limited to a passive investment, so that neither the private equity fund nor any manager, employee, or agent of the private equity fund has any involvement in, or control over, the management of the licensed business or of the licensee.

(2) The private equity fund advisers are registered under the federal Investment Advisers Act of 1940, and the private equity
 fund advisers are subject to, and comply with, Section 275.204(b)-1 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) An investor shall not, directly or indirectly, hold more than 10-percent interest in the private equity fund.

(4) An investor in the private equity fund shall not have any control, directly or indirectly, over the investment decisions of the private equity fund.

(b) For purposes of this section, private equity fund means an investment company that makes investments in equity or debt securities of another company that does not provide investors with redemption rights in the ordinary course. A private equity fund does not include a hedge fund, liquidity fund, real estate fund, securitized
 asset fund, or venture capital fund.

(c) The department may require the manager of the private equity fund to execute an affidavit confirming compliance with the requirements of this section. If the manager does not have personal knowledge of any of the facts necessary to execute the affidavit, the manager shall make a diligent inquiry and may thereafter execute the affidavit upon information and belief. The manager of the private equity fund shall promptly notify the department in writing if any of the facts attested to change.

(d) This section is not intended to allow a person, by reason of
 the person’s investment in a private equity fund, to hold an interest in a license issued by the department if that interest is not otherwise permitted under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 1.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Club Licenses [23425. - 23438.]

23425.

For the purposes of this article “club” means:

(a) Any chapter, aerie, parlor, lodge, or other local unit of an American national fraternal organization which has as the owner, lessee, or occupant thereof operated an establishment for fraternal purposes. An American national fraternal organization as used in this subdivision shall actively operate in not less than 20 states of the Union and have not less than 175 local units in those 20 states, and shall have been in active continuous existence for not less than 20 years.

(b) Any hall or building
 association of a local unit mentioned in subdivision (a), all of the capital stock of which is owned by the local unit or the members thereof, and which operates the clubroom facilities of the local unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 470.)
-------------------------------------------

23426.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any golf club which owns, maintains, or operates a regular golf links together with a clubhouse thereon; or any swimming and tennis club which maintains a standard AAU swimming pool and not less than two regulation tennis courts, together with the necessary facilities and clubhouse, which has members paying regular monthly dues; or any swimming club which maintains a standard AAU swimming pool and not less than two regulation tennis courts, together with the necessary facilities and clubhouse, or any tennis club which maintains not less than five regulation tennis courts, together with the necessary facilities and clubhouse,
 and which swimming club or tennis club has members paying regular monthly dues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23426.5.

(a) For purposes of this article, “club” also means any tennis club that maintains not less than four regulation tennis courts, together with the necessary facilities and clubhouse, has members paying regular monthly dues, has been in existence for not less than 45 years, and is not associated with a common interest development as defined in Section 4100 or 6534 of the Civil Code, a community apartment
 project as defined in Section 11004 of this code, a project consisting of condominiums as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, or a mobilehome park as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any club licensed pursuant to this section to make any discrimination, distinction, or restriction against any person on account of age or any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 17) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 6.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23427.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any yacht club which is a nonprofit organization and is a regular member of a recognized national nonprofit yachting organization having a membership of not less than 200 member yacht clubs, which owns, maintains, or operates a clubhouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any bar association having an authorized delegate to the American Bar Association and composed entirely of attorneys at law, duly admitted, licensed, and qualified to practice within the state, which has a bona fide membership of more than 1,000 members and has been in existence for a period of more than 20 years, and which owns, leases, operates or maintains, a club room or rooms for its membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.1.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any county medical association having an authorized delegate to the California Medical Association and composed entirely of doctors of medicine duly admitted, licensed and qualified to practice medicine and surgery within the State, which has a bona fide membership of more than 1,000 members and has been in existence for a period of more than 20 years and which owns, leases, operates or maintains a club room or rooms for its members, and has operated the club room or rooms for a period of not less than three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.2.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any rod and gun club which is a nonprofit organization belonging to a recognized national association of rod or gun clubs, and which has more than 100 bona fide regular members, each of whom is required to pay regular membership dues of not less than five dollars ($5) each year, and which owns, maintains, or operates a clubhouse and has continuously operated a clubhouse for not less than three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 345.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.4.

For the purpose of this article, “club” also means any nonprofit social club with at least 100 members, which members are mobilehome owners within a private mobilehome park and have participated as social club members with a designated clubhouse for not less than one year.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23428.7 (as added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 623) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.5.

For the purpose of this article “club” also means any press club which is a nonprofit organization and whose members are entitled to exchange privileges with similar organizations in at least 12 other states, and which has a bona fide membership and which owns, leases, and operates or maintains a clubhouse or clubroom or any nonprofit incorporated press club having a membership and which owns, or leases, and operates, a club room or rooms for its members.

No license shall be issued to any press club qualifying as a club pursuant to this section if the press club in any manner restricts membership or the use of its facilities on the
 basis of race, religion, national origin, or sex.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.6.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any association of livestock, or livestock-allied businessmen, joined together as a nonprofit corporation, registered as such in the State of California. The organization of the group shall be for the sole purpose of social activity.

Such a group shall own, lease, or maintain a club room or rooms for its membership. Such a club may sell and serve alcoholic beverages only to its bona fide members and their bona fide guests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.7.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any bona fide nonprofit corporation, which is a bona fide horse riding club, which is a member of a statewide organization or association, which owns, maintains, or operates premises upon which a regular riding club together with a clubhouse is maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.8.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any parlor of the Native Sons of the Golden West which has as the owner, lessee or occupant thereof operated an establishment for fraternal purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.9.

For the purpose of this article “club” also means any nonprofit social club which serves daily meals to its members and guests, owns or leases, operates and maintains a club room or rooms for its membership and has operated the club room or rooms for a period of not less than two years and has regular membership dues of not less than fifty dollars ($50) per year per member.
